fr: Configuration du moteur: À plat/Boxer (H); En ligne (I); À pistons opposés; En étoile; Rotatif (Wankel); En V; En VR; En W; Autre
hr-HR: Konfiguracija motora: Ravni / Boxer (H); Redni (I); S protuhodnim klipovima; Radijalni; Rotacijski (Wankel); V; VR; W; Ostalo
pl: Konfiguracja silnika: Płaski/Boxer (H); Rzędowy (I); Przeciwsobny; Gwiazdowy; Rotacyjny (Wankla); V; VR; W; Inne
zh-CN: 发动机配置: 水平对置（H）; 直列（I）; 对置活塞; 星型; 转子（Wankel）; V 型; VR 型; W 型; 其他
sl-SI: Konfiguracija motorja: Bokserski (H); Vrstni (I); Nasprotni bati; Zvezdasti; Rotacijski (Wanklov); V; VR; W; Drugo
pt-BR: Configuração do motor: Plano/Boxer (H); Em linha (I); Pistões opostos; Radial; Rotativo (Wankel); V; VR; W; Outro
ro-RO: Configurația motorului: Plat/Boxer (H); În linie (I); Cu pistoane opuse; Radial; Rotativ (Wankel); V; VR; W; Altele
fi: Moottorikokoonpano: Bokseri (H); Rivi (I); Vastamäntä; Tähti; Kiertomäntä (Wankel); V; VR; W; Muu
hu: Motor konfigurációja: Lapos/Boxer (H); Soros (I); Ellendugattyús; Csillag; Bolygódugattyús (Wankel); V; VR; W; Egyéb
cs: Konfigurace motoru: Plochý / boxer (H); Řadový (I); S protiběžnými písty; Hvězdicový; Rotační (Wankel); V; VR; W; Jiné
da: Konfiguration af motor: Flad/bokser (H); Række (I); Modkørende stempler; Stjernemotor; Rotationsmotor (Wankel); V; VR; W; Andet
zh-TW: 引擎配置: 水平對臥 (H); 直列 (I); 對向活塞; 星型; 轉子 (Wankel); V; VR; W; 其他
ja: エンジン構成: 水平対向/ボクサー (H); 直列 (I); 対向ピストン; 星型; ロータリー (ヴァンケル); V型; VR型; W型; その他
sv: Motorkonfiguration: Boxermotor (H); Rak motor (I); Motkolv; Stjärnmotor; Rotationsmotor (wankel); V; VR; W; Annat
de: Motorkonfiguration: Boxermotor (H); Reihenmotor (I); Gegenkolbenmotor; Sternmotor; Kreiskolbenmotor (Wankel); V-Motor; VR-Motor; W-Motor; Sonstige
nb: Motorkonfigurasjon: Flat/boxer (H); Rekkemotor (I); Motgående stempler; Stjernemotor; Rotasjonsmotor (Wankel); V; VR; W; Annet
ko: 엔진 구성: 플랫/박서(H); 인라인(I); 대향 피스톤; 레이디얼; 로터리(방켈); V; VR; W; 기타
th: รูปแบบการจัดวางเครื่องยนต์: สูบนอน/บ็อกเซอร์ (H); สูบเรียง (I); ลูกสูบตรงข้าม; เรเดียล; โรตารี (Wankel); V; VR; W; อื่นๆ
bg-BG: Конфигурация на двигателя: Плосък/боксер (H); Редови (I); Срещуположни бутала; Звездообразен (радиален); Роторен (Ванкел); V-образен; VR-образен; W-образен; Друго
el: Διαμόρφωση κινητήρα: Επίπεδος/Boxer (H); Εν σειρά (I); Αντιτιθέμενων εμβόλων; Αστεροειδής; Περιστροφικός (Wankel); V; VR; W; Άλλο
vi: Cấu hình động cơ: Dạng phẳng/Boxer (H); Thẳng hàng (I); Piston đối đỉnh; Hình sao; Xoay (Wankel); Chữ V; VR; W; Khác
sk-SK: Konfigurácia motora: Plochý/Boxer (H); Radový (I); S protibežnými piestami; Hviezdicový; Rotačný (Wankel); V; VR; W; Iné
nl: Motorconfiguratie: Plat/boxer (H); Lijn (I); Tegengestelde zuigers; Radiaal; Roterend (wankel); V; VR; W; Overig
tr: Motor konfigürasyonu: Düz/Boxer (H); Sıralı (I); Karşılıklı pistonlu; Radyal; Döner (Wankel); V; VR; W; Diğer
lt-LT: Variklio konfigūracija: Opozicinis (H formos); Vienaeilis (I formos); Su priešpriešiniais stūmokliais; Žvaigždinis (Radial); Rotorinis (Vankelio); V formos; VR formos; W formos; Kita
it: Configurazione del motore: Cilindri contrapposti/Boxer (H); In linea (I); A pistoni contrapposti; Radiale; Rotativo (Wankel); A V; VR; A W; Altro
en: Engine configuration: Flat/Boxer (H); Inline (I); Opposed-piston; Radial; Rotary (Wankel); V; VR; W; Other
ru: Конфигурация двигателя: Оппозитный (H); Рядный (I); Встречно-поршневой; Радиальный; Роторный (Ванкеля); V-образный; VR-образный; W-образный; Другое
pt-PT: Configuração do motor: Plano/Boxer (H); Em linha (I); Pistões opostos; Radial; Rotativo (Wankel); V; VR; W; Outro
es: Configuración del motor: Plano/bóxer (H); En línea (I); Pistones opuestos; Radial; Rotativo (Wankel); V; VR; W; Otra